Hawaii statutes.
§710-1063 Unsworn falsification to
authorities. (1) A person commits the offense of unsworn falsification to
authorities if, with an intent to mislead a public servant in the performance
of the public servant's duty, the person:

(a) Makes any statement, in written, printed, or
electronic form, which the person does not believe to be true, in an
application for any pecuniary or other benefit or in a record or report
required by law to be submitted to any governmental agency;

(b) Submits or invites reliance on any statement,
document, or record, in written, printed, or electronic form, which the person
knows to be falsely made, completed, or altered; or

(c) Submits or invites reliance on any sample,
specimen, map, boundary-mark, or other object the person knows to be false.

(2) Unsworn falsification to authorities is a
misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1993; am L 2014, c 33, §6]

COMMENTARY ON §§710-1060 TO 710-1063

Efficiency and fairness of governmental operations and public
confidence in public administration, in general, and the administration of
justice, in particular, require that information which the government relies
upon not be falsified. Yet a general, undifferentiated penalty for all
falsification to governmental authorities would not reflect contemporary social
mores.

False testimony and other misleading
information to officials can convert governmental power into an instrument of
injustice rather than justice, with unfortunate consequences not only for the
individual whose life, freedom or property may be affected, but also for the
community's general sense of security and confidence in the state. On the
other hand, not all lying to officials can usefully or safely be made
criminal. Measures other than punishment are our principal reliance against
falsehood in judicial and other proceedings, where cross-examination and the
opportunity to produce evidence on both sides of any issue facilitate the
process of arriving at truth.[1]

It has been noted that a great difficulty in the law of perjury
has been the severity of the penalties specified by the statutes; "in some
situations falsification to officials is so widely practiced and tolerated by
prevailing moral standards that severe penalties would be unrealistic."[2]
For example, a person may claim domicile in a state in order to obtain a
divorce when the person's real intent is to satisfy the minimum requirement of
physical presence and to leave the state as soon as the decree is obtained. It
is essential to distinguish between minor and more aggravated forms of false
swearing.

General analysis. These sections divide falsification
into four different offenses of three different grades depending on the
presence of aggravating circumstances.

The offense of perjury, a class C felony, requires (a) a
false statement which the court determines to be "material," (b) made
under an oath, (c) in an official proceeding. This is the most serious offense
and the only felony in this part. Other forms of falsification, whether under
oath or not, are graded as misdemeanors or petty misdemeanors. Falsification
before a court, legislative committee, administrative agency, or other official
proceeding, as defined in §710-1000(12), is deemed more culpable and more
socially dangerous than similar falsity in a report, license application, or
like matter, especially when these types of statements are often prepared by a
lawyer.[3]

A false statement made under oath may constitute a
misdemeanor if (a) it is made in an official proceeding, or (b) it is made with
intent to mislead a public servant in the performance of the public servant's
official duty. The statement need not be a "materially false statement."
The offense is labeled false swearing to authorities.

False swearing, a residual offense, makes all other false
statements, made under an oath required or authorized by law, a petty
misdemeanor. In addition to other cases, this offense would cover
falsification in a written statement which, pursuant to a requirement or
authorization of law, has been sworn to before a notary, in a strictly private
transaction. It would also cover a false affidavit filed with the government
but not in an official proceeding, regardless of materiality or intent to
mislead.

The final offense in this quartet does not require that the
statement be under oath. Indeed, that statement need not be written; the
falsification can be in the form of submission of, or invitation to rely on,
false samples, specimens, maps, boundary-marks, or other objects. However, the
falsification must be made with intent to mislead a public servant in the
performance of the public servant's official duty.

Mens rea with respect to the truth of the statement.
Under the offenses in this part, a defendant is not held liable for a false
statement made inadvertently or out of ignorance. For penal liability to
occur, the defendant's state of mind with regard to the truth of the statement
must be a lack of an affirmative belief in the truth of the matter asserted.
The defendant need not know the falsity of the statement, it would be
sufficient for conviction if the defendant had no belief with regard to the
statement's truthfulness. The defendant may have no idea whether or not the
defendant's statement is true; but a lack of belief that it is true will
support a conviction. The state of mind required is, in effect, a reckless
disregard of the truth of the matter asserted. However, the requisite
culpability is not expressed with the word "reckless" because
applying that word, as defined in §702-206(3), presents certain difficulties
when applied to the falsification offenses of this part. As the commentary to
the Model Penal Code explains the problem:

We have chosen to specify the mental
state of lack of belief, in this section, rather than rely on the general
definition of "recklessness" in [Section 702-206(3)], for two
reasons. First, it requires considerable mental agility to construe [Section
702-206(3)] as applied to perjury, and second, we are satisfied that once lack
of belief is established, no further inquiry into "justification" or "degree
of culpability" would be useful.[4]

The nature of the oath requirement. The requirement
or authorization of an oath is an implied instruction by the legislature to the
individual making the statement that the information requested is of special
significance, and that special sanctions will attend any falsifications. Since
the oath's significance rests partially upon the legislative directive, it
follows that an oath which is attended by penal sanctions ought to be one which
is specifically required or authorized by law.[5] A public servant or private
individual could not, as a matter of local policy or individual whim, require
an oath without any basis in law and thereby make falsifications thereunder
subject to these sanctions.

Section 710-1000(10), defining "oath," is
specifically designed to provide government agencies with a convenient method
of demanding the truth in applications and registrations without resort to
cumbersome procedures of requiring oaths before notaries. With regard to the
function of these falsification offenses, it should not matter whether the
State's special emphasis on receiving truthful information is indicated by a
requirement of an oath or affirmation, or by written notice on a government
form. The notice of special significance of the requested information and the
warning of special sanctions are the same in either case.

Materiality; intent to mislead. Materiality with
regard to a false statement (required for a perjury conviction) and an intent
to mislead a public servant (required for one form of false swearing in
official matters and for all forms of unsworn falsification to authorities) are
similar in their functional role: each limits the application of an offense
when the falsification is not likely to obstruct justice or which is trivial.
On the other hand, the terms are not synonymous. A person may not intend to
mislead, yet the person's falsification may be material.

Materiality of the falsification distinguishes perjury, a
felony, from the lesser offenses in this part. Given the requisite state of
mind with regard to truthfulness of the statement, falsification, in an
official proceeding, which is material, constitutes the greatest risk of obstruction
of justice. A "materially false statement" means:

any false statement, regardless of its
admissibility under the rules of evidence, which could have affected the course
or outcome of the proceeding.[6]

Section 710-1060 holds the actor strictly liable with regard
to the actor's knowledge of a false statement's materiality. Materiality is
not made an element of the offense; it is not a fact which the trier of fact
must find, but a question of law for the court to determine.[7] Beyond the difficulty
of proving a culpable state of mind with regard to this factor, the importance
of the examination of witnesses in judicial and quasi-judicial proceedings is
such that it is extremely unwise to allow a witness to decide what may or may
not be material. Witnesses are usually not qualified to make judgments on
materiality in the technical sense in which that concept is here employed. A
crucial quality of an official proceeding, as defined in §710-1000(12), is that
the hearing presents the "opportunity to test the credibility of witnesses
by questioning that may begin, or wander, far from the central theme."[8]
As the commentary to the Proposed Michigan Criminal Code states:

A witness who falsifies an answer to
a quite distant question he considers irrelevant may be blocking the eventual
trial to relevant truth, thereby defeating one of the principal values of the
hearing. Where, on the other hand, the false statement is made on a written
application or report submitted to the government, there is considerably less
likelihood that the actor will be confused about the materiality of the
information given.[9]

One form of false swearing to authorities, §710-1061(1)(b),
and all forms of unsworn falsification to authorities, §710-1063, require that
the actor have an intent to mislead a public servant in the performance of the
public servant's official duty. The falsification need not be material, but
the actor's intent is crucial. Trivial falsifications which (1) do not impair
the examination process of an official proceeding, and (2) are not intended to
mislead the public servant, do not warrant the misdemeanor sanction. These
falsifications are penalized, if at all, as false swearing (§710-1062), a petty
misdemeanor.

The nature of the statement required. "Statement"
is defined in §710-1000(16) to mean:

any representation, but includes a
representation of opinion, belief, or other state of mind only if the
representation clearly relates to state of mind apart from or in addition to
any facts which are the subject of the representation.

A prosecution for perjury or other offense defined by this part
can be based on a statement of opinion or belief. The definition of "statement"
is intended, however, to preclude liability based on the following logic: (1)
the declarant states that X is so; (2) the declarant's statement includes,
implicitly, a statement that the declarant believes X to be so; (3) although
there is no evidence that X is not so, the declarant may be liable because the
declarant did not believe X to be so. "The possibility of such
prosecutions is disquieting.... [T]he making of true statements which the
declarant believes to be false can hardly obstruct justice...."[10]

Previous Hawaii law. Previous Hawaii law defined
perjury as "wilfully, knowingly and falsely stating... some material fact
on oath where the oath is required or authorized by law."[11] While there
has been very little judicial interpretation of the requirements of "wilfully,
knowingly and falsely," stating the fact, the potential confusion with
regard to (1) the meaning of "wilfully," as it relates or adds to "knowingly,"
and (2) the actor's knowledge of the statement's materiality or falsity, is
largely obviated by the language of the Code. The Code provides a needed definition
of "materiality" which is in substantial accord with court
interpretation of that requirement.[12] Like the Code, previous law provided
that the oath must be authorized or required by law.[13]

The former sanction of a possible twenty years' imprisonment[14]
seems entirely disproportionate to the severity of the offense. Especially in
light of the above discussion of overly severe penalties, a maximum penalty
which is equivalent to the Code's penalty for murder, rape in the first degree,
and kidnapping, probably tends more to undermine certainty of application than
it does to deter perjury. As the National Conference of Commissioners on
Uniform State Laws has said:

[A] great difficulty in administering
the law of perjury has been the severity of the penalties specified by the
statutes. In the less aggravated forms of perjury, much could be gained in
effectiveness and respect by making penalties less severe in the books and more
frequently applied in the court rooms.[15]

The Code's class C felony sanction for perjury is in accord
with that of the Model Penal Code and recent penal revisions.[16]

No provision is made in this Code for subornation of
perjury.[17] Such cases are adequately covered by the sections dealing with
solicitation.[18] Furthermore, if perjury is committed following the
solicitation, the suborner will be liable for the offense of perjury itself on
the basis of the suborner's complicity in, and responsibility for, the conduct
of the declarant.[19]

Under previous Hawaii law, all false swearing was either
punished as perjury, or not at all. The Code adds to the law two lesser
offenses, and grades the falsifications according to the culpability of the
defendant and the tendency of the falsification to subvert the administration
of justice or the performance of official duty. The Code also adds an offense
covering unsworn falsification to authorities. These three new offenses cover
wide gaps in the prior law relating to falsification.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §§710-1060 TO 710-1063

Act 33, Session Laws 2014, amended §710-1063 to apply to
electronic statements, documents, or records. The legislature found that many
government and business records are kept in electronic form. However, the
current law prohibited only the alteration of records kept in written form. In
2000, Hawaii adopted the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, chapter 489E, to
recognize the need to establish the legal validity of electronic records,
signatures, and contracts. Act 33 protected consumers by making relevant
criminal offenses also applicable to electronic statements, documents, or
records. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3330, House Standing Committee
Report No. 260-14.

__________

§§710-1060 To 710-1063 Commentary:

1. M.P.C., Tentative Draft No. 6, comments at 100 (1957).

2. Id.

3. Prop. Mich. Rev. Cr. Code, comments at 394.

4. M.P.C., Tentative Draft No. 6, comments at 126 (1957).

5. See Prop. Mich. Rev. Cr. Code, comments at 390-391.

6. §710-1000(9).

7. §710-1060(2).

8. M.P.C., Tentative Draft No. 6, comments at 126 (1957).
Note that this reasoning would favor imposition of criminal liability
regardless of the materiality of the statement: the Code in fact does this by
the misdemeanor offense of false swearing to authorities (§710-1061), if the
false swearing occurs in an official proceeding, and by the general residual
petty misdemeanor offense of false swearing (§710-1062), which makes any false
statement under oath an offense.

9. Prop. Mich. Rev. Cr. Code, comments at 398.

10. M.P.C., Tentative Draft No. 6, comments at 117 (1957).

11. H.R.S. §756-1.

12. See The King v. Angee, 8 Haw. 259 (1891) and In re French,
28 Haw. 47 (1924) (dictum).

13. But see commentary to §710-1068, infra, on the effect of
irregularities in administering the oath.

14. H.R.S. §756-5.

15. The National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State
Laws, Model Act on Perjury, Prefatory Note (1952), quoted in M.P.C., Tentative
Draft No. 6, comments at 102 (1957).

16. M.P.C. §241.1; N.Y.R.P.L. §210.15; Prop. Del. Cr. Code
§722; Prop. Mich. Rev. Cr. Code §4905; Prop. Pa. Cr. Code §2102.

17. See H.R.S. §756-3.

18. Cf. §705-510, et seq.

19. Cf. §702-221, et seq.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next